lrec2010_examples/guesser.foma
read lexc defaultnom.lexc
define guess;
read lexc Adjpl.lexc
define spnn;
read lexc specialAdj.lexc
define spadj;
read lexc diminutive.lexc
define dimm

!Handling pluralization
define conpl [..] -> e || á | Á | b | c | d | é | É | f | g | h |í | Í | j | k | l | m | n | ñ | Ñ | ó | Ó | p | q | r | s | t | ú | Ú | ü | Ü | v | w | x | y | B | C | D | F | G | H | J | K | L | M | N | P | Q | R | S | T | V | W | X | Y  _ "^" s .#. ;

define accpl í -> ie, ó -> oe, ú -> ue, á -> ae, é -> ee || _ "^" s .#.;

define cz z -> c e || _ "^" s .#. ;


define Cleanup "^" -> 0 ;

regex [dimm .o. Cleanup] .p. [spadj .o. Cleanup] .p. [spnn .o. Cleanup] .p. [guess .o. sppl .o. cz .o. Cleanup] ;
